Utah statutes.
72-7-202.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Automobile graveyard" means any establishment or place of business which
is maintained, used, or operated for storing, keeping, buying, or selling
wrecked, scrapped, ruined, or dismantled motor vehicles or motor vehicle
parts.
(2)  "Junk" means old or scrap copper, brass, rope, rags, batteries, plastic,
paper, trash, rubber, waste, junked, dismantled, or wrecked automobiles or
their parts, and iron, steel, and other old or scrap ferrous or nonferrous
material.
(3)  "Junkyard" means any place, establishment, or business maintained, used,
or operated for storing, keeping, buying, or selling junk, or for the
maintenance or operation of an automobile graveyard.  Junkyard includes a
salvage yard, war surplus yard, garbage dump, recycling facility, garbage
processing facility, and sanitary land fill.
